District of Columbia statutes.
2-272.04

Public-Private Partnership Administration Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Public-Private Partnership Administration Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Executive Director in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

All administrative fees collected under § 2-273.02(d) and § 2-273.04(d) shall be deposited into the Fund.

(c)

Money in the Fund shall be used to pay for the costs associated with carrying out §§ 2-273.02 and 2-273.04.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of the fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-228, § 105, 62 DCR 261